Utah statutes.
65A-6-2.   Mineral leases -- Division to prescribe rules.

The division shall by rule prescribe:

(1)  the term of the lease;

(2)  the annual rental;

(3)  the amount of royalty in addition to or in lieu of rental; and

(4)  the basis upon which the royalty shall be computed.

